Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1728
Submission of proposals; procedure; evaluation of proposals; commission; power to negotiate.

(1) Construction managers shall submit proposals as required by the request for proposals.

(2) Proposals shall be sealed and shall not be opened until expiration of the time established for making the proposals as set forth in the request for proposals.

(3) Proposals may be withdrawn at any time prior to signing a contract for preconstruction services. The commission shall have the right to reject any and all proposals at no cost to the commission. The commission may thereafter solicit new proposals or may cancel the construction manager-general contractor procurement process.

(4) The commission shall rank the construction managers in accordance with the qualification-based selection process and pursuant to the criteria in the request for proposals. The commission may meet with construction managers prior to the ranking.

(5) The commission may attempt to negotiate a contract for preconstruction services with the highest ranked construction manager and may enter into a contract for preconstruction services after negotiations. If the commission is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract for preconstruction services with the highest ranked construction manager, the commission may terminate negotiations with that construction manager. The commission may then undertake negotiations with the second highest ranked construction manager and may enter into a contract for preconstruction services after negotiations. If the commission is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract with the second highest ranked construction manager, the commission may undertake negotiations with the third highest ranked construction manager, if any, and may enter into a contract for preconstruction services after negotiations.

(6) If the commission is unable to negotiate a satisfactory contract for preconstruction services with any of the ranked construction managers, the commission may either revise the request for proposals and solicit new proposals or cancel the construction manager-general contractor contract process under the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 29.